Wisconsin, session 2025, AB338.
do enact as follows:AB338,11Section 1. 609.865 of the statutes is created to read:AB338,2,42609.865 Coverage of treatment for mental health or substance use 3disorders. Limited service health organizations, preferred provider plans, and 4defined network plans are subject to s. 632.895 (12g).AB338,25Section 2. 632.895 (12g) of the statutes is created to read:AB338,2,136632.895 (12g) Treatment of mental health or substance use disorders. 7(a) Subject to par. (c), every disability insurance policy and self-insured health plan 8of the state or a county, city, village, town, or school district that provides coverage 9of mental health or behavioral health items or services shall provide in each policy 10year coverage of at least 28 appointments or visits with a mental health care 11provider to treat mental health or substance use disorders or as many 12appointments or visits with a mental health care provider as are necessary to meet 13the insured’s treatment goals.AB338,2,1614(b) No disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan that is required 15to provide the coverage under par. (a) may require prior authorization for the 16coverage under par. (a).AB338,3,517(c) 1. The office of the commissioner of insurance shall prepare a preliminary 18actuarial estimate of the average cost for all qualified health plans, as defined in 45 19CFR 155.20, attributable to the coverage required under par. (a). The office of the 20commissioner of insurance shall prepare the preliminary actuarial estimate based 1on an analysis performed in accordance with generally accepted actuarial 2principles and methodologies. The office of the commissioner of insurance may, in 3consultation with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, select 4factors and methodology as necessary to prepare the preliminary actuarial 5estimate under this subdivision.AB338,3,862. If the preliminary actuarial estimate of the average cost for all qualified 7health plans described under subd. 1. is an increase of greater than 10 percent, the 8office of the commissioner of insurance may not enforce par. (a).AB338,39Section 3. Initial applicability.AB338,3,1210(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 11(12g), the treatment of s. 632.895 (12g) first applies to policy or plan years 12beginning on the effective date of this subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB338,3,1713(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 14agreement containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 (12g), the treatment 15of s. 632.895 (12g) first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date 16of this subsection or on the day on which the collective bargaining agreement is 17newly established, extended, modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB338,418Section 4. Effective date.AB338,3,2019(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 20publication.AB338,3,2121